Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,187
Special speed limitations; motor vehicle towing a mobile home; motor-driven cycle.

(1) No person shall operate any motor vehicle when towing a mobile home at a rate of speed in excess of fifty miles per hour.

(2)(a) A person may operate any motor-driven cycle at a speed in excess of thirty-five miles per hour upon a roadway at nighttime if such motor-driven cycle is equipped with a headlight or headlights capable of revealing a person or vehicle in such roadway at least three hundred feet ahead and with a taillight on the rear exhibiting a red light visible, under normal atmospheric conditions, from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the rear of such motor-driven cycle.

(b) A person may operate any motor-driven cycle at a speed in excess of twenty-five miles per hour, but not more than thirty-five miles per hour, upon a roadway at nighttime if such motor-driven cycle is equipped with a headlight or headlights capable of revealing a person or vehicle in such roadway at least one hundred feet ahead, but less than three hundred feet ahead, and with a taillight on the rear exhibiting a red light visible, under normal atmospheric conditions, from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the rear of such motor-driven cycle.

(c) A person shall not operate any motor-driven cycle upon a roadway at nighttime if the headlight or headlights do not reveal a person or vehicle in such roadway at least one hundred feet ahead, or the taillight is not visible, under normal atmospheric conditions, from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the rear of such motor-driven cycle.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 66;

Laws 1974, LB 873, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 381, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 256, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 23, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 430, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 504, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 369, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-666;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 283;

Laws 1996, LB 901, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 80, § 1.

Livestock forage vehicles, speed limits, see section 60-6,305.

Mopeds, maximum speed, see section 60-6,313.

Operator's license, assessment of points for speeding, see section 60-4,182 et seq.

Unreasonable classification of persons is not created hereby. State ex rel. Douglas v. Gradwohl, 194 Neb. 745, 235 N.W.2d 854 (1975).